Montana, session 2025, HB466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Agency determination of categorical exclusion. (1) (a) A state agency
as defined in 2-4-102 shall identify actions that meet the definition of a categorical exclusion as provided in 75-
1-220.
(b) A state action identified by a state agency as a categorical exclusion is exempt from the
provisions of Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2.
(c) A state action determined by the state agency as meeting the requirements of a categorical
exclusion under the National Environmental Policy Act, 42 U.S.C. 4321 et seq., and 40 CFR, parts 1500
through 1508, is exempt from the provisions of Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2.
(2) For a state action identified by a state agency as a categorical exclusion, there is a rebuttable
presumption that extraordinary circumstances do not exist and that neither an environmental analysis nor an
environmental impact statement is required.
(3) This section does not alter, diminish, or impair exemptions from environmental review under
Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2, including for:
(a) inspection, contracting, funds transfer, bonding, inventorying, and other general powers and
duties of the department of administration for the construction of a building pursuant to [section 3];
(b) grants awarded under the historic preservation grant program pursuant to [section 4];
(c) funding for a snowmobile area operator previously reviewed pursuant to 23-2-657;
(d) small business licensing pursuant to 30-16-103;
(e) certain oversized load permits pursuant to 61-10-121;
(f) legislation pursuant to 75-1-201;
(g) certain ownership interests, entitlements, or permissions pursuant to 75-1-201;
(h) activities of the public service commission pursuant to 75-1-201;
(i) transfer of permits for portable emission sources pursuant to 75-2-211;
(j) registration of certain animal or human crematoriums pursuant to 75-2-215;
(k) coal-fired generation unit remediation plans pursuant to 75-8-106;
(l) sanitation review of certain subdivisions pursuant to 76-4-136;
- 2 - LC 1423

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC 1423
(m) siting adjustment within a major facility siting corridor pursuant to 75-20-303;
(n) issuance of grants from the department of natural resources and conservation for authorized
activities to conserve habitat, reduce wildfire risk, or improve forest health pursuant to 76-13-119;
(o) grants, loans, or bonds for conservation district activities pursuant to 76-15-107;
(p) issuance of a license from the department of natural resources and conservation or the board
of land commissioners subject to further permitting by the department of environmental quality pursuant to 77-
1-121;
(q) issuance of trust land lease renewals pursuant to 77-1-121;
(r) nonaction of the department of natural resources and conservation or the board of land
commissioners even when authorized to act pursuant to 77-1-121;
(s) actions of the department of natural resources and conservation or the board of land
commissioners to comply with local planning and zoning pursuant to 77-1-121;
(t) actions on certain maintenance activities by the department of natural resources and
conservation or the board of land commissioners related to agricultural or grazing leases pursuant to 77-1-121;
(u) issuance of historic right-of-way deeds across state lands pursuant to 77-1-130;
(v) a qualified exemption for reciprocal access agreements on state lands pursuant to 77-1-617;
(w) authorization of historic use of a navigable river bed pursuant to 77-1-1112;
(x) right-of-way easements on state lands pursuant to 77-2-103;
(y) sale of a parcel formerly leased as a cabin or home site pursuant to 77-2-363;
(z) certain emergency timber sales or time-dependent land access for a timber sale pursuant to
77-5-201;
(aa) grants, loans, or bonds related to conservation, reclamation, and renewable resource activities
pursuant to 80-7-1031;
(bb) minor revisions to coal and uranium mine permits and reclamation plans pursuant to 82-4-229;
(cc) transfer of certain coal mine operating permits pursuant to 82-4-250;
(dd) authorized small miners pursuant to 82-4-305;
(ee) certain actions that involve minor amendments to a hard-rock mine operating permit pursuant
to 82-4-342;
- 3 - LC 1423

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC 1423
(ff) grants, loans, or bonds related to conservation, reclamation, and renewable resource activities
pursuant to 85-1-632;
(gg) sale of a leased cabin or home site pursuant to 85-1-812;
(hh) domestic livestock trailing on land owned or controlled by the department of fish, wildlife, and
parks pursuant to 87-1-303;
(ii) grants, loans, or bonds related to conservation, reclamation, and renewable resource activities
pursuant to 90-2-1122
(jj) emergency energy orders issued by the governor pursuant to 90-4-310;
(kk) certain coal board grants pursuant to 90-6-213; and
(ll) department of commerce grants for the Montana coal endowment program pursuant to 90-6-
716.
(4) State agencies retain all existing authority provided in Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2, to
identify and adopt, as authorized by rule, categorical exclusions and programmatic environmental assessments.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Report to legislature. State agencies as defined in 2-4-102 shall track
the number and use of categorical exclusions and make those available upon request of the environmental
quality council established in 5-16-101.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Exemption from environmental review. The department of
administration is exempt from the provisions of Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2, when inspecting, contracting,
transferring funds, bonding, inventorying, and carrying out other general powers and duties of the department of
administration for the construction of a building.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Exemption from environmental review. The department of commerce
is exempt from the provisions of Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2, when authorizing grants, administering a
grant program, or creating a grant program related to historic preservation pursuant to this part.

Section 5. Section 75-1-220, MCA, is amended to read:
- 4 - LC 1423

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC 1423
"75-1-220. Definitions. For the purposes of this part, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Alternatives analysis" means an evaluation of different parameters, mitigation measures, or
control measures that would accomplish the same objectives as those included in the proposed action by the
applicant. For a project that is not a state-sponsored project, it does not include an alternative facility or an
alternative to the proposed project itself. The term includes alternatives required pursuant to Title 75, chapter
20.
(2) "Appropriate board" means, for administrative actions taken under this part by the:
(a) department of environmental quality, the board of environmental review, as provided for in 2-
15-3502;
(b) department of fish, wildlife, and parks, the fish and wildlife commission, as provided for in 2-15-
3402, and the state parks and recreation board, as provided for in 2-15-3406;
(c) department of transportation, the transportation commission, as provided for in 2-15-2502;
(d) department of natural resources and conservation for state trust land issues, the board of land
commissioners, as provided for in Article X, section 4, of the Montana constitution;
(e) department of natural resources and conservation for oil and gas issues, the board of oil and
gas conservation, as provided for in 2-15-3303; and
(f) department of livestock, the board of livestock, as provided for in 2-15-3102.
(3) "Categorical exclusion" means a state action that does not individually, collectively, or
cumulatively require an environmental analysis or environmental impact statement, as determined by agency
rulemaking, programmatic review, or statute, unless extraordinary circumstances exist as defined by the
agency rulemaking, programmatic review, or statute.
(3) (4) "Complete application" means, for the purpose of complying with this part, an application for a
permit, license, or other authorization that contains all data, studies, plans, information, forms, fees, and
signatures required to be included with the application sufficient for the agency to approve the application under
the applicable statutes and rules.
(4) (5) "Cumulative impacts" means the collective impacts on the human environment within the
borders of Montana of the proposed action when considered in conjunction with other past, present, and future
actions related to the proposed action by location or generic type.
- 5 - LC 1423

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC 1423
(5) (6) "Environmental review" means any environmental assessment, environmental impact
statement, or other written analysis required under this part by a state agency of a proposed action to
determine, examine, or document the effects and impacts of the proposed action on the quality of the human
and physical environment within the borders of Montana as required under this part.
(6) (7) "Project sponsor" means any applicant, owner, operator, agency, or other entity that is
proposing an action that requires an environmental review. If the action involves state agency-initiated actions
on state trust lands, the term also includes each institutional beneficiary of any trust as described in The
Enabling Act of Congress, approved February 22, 1899, 25 Stat. 676, as amended, the Morrill Act of 1862, 7
U.S.C. 301 through 308, and the Morrill Act of 1890, 7 U.S.C. 321 through 329.
(7) (8) "Public scoping process" means any process to determine the scope of an environmental
review.
(8) (9) (a) "State-sponsored project" means:
(i) a project, program, or activity initiated and directly undertaken by a state agency;
(ii) except as provided in subsection (8)(b)(i) (9)(b)(i), a project or activity supported through a
contract, grant, subsidy, loan, or other form of funding assistance from a state agency, either singly or in
combination with one or more other state agencies; or
(iii) except as provided in subsection (8)(b)(i) (9)(b)(i), a project or activity authorized by a state
agency acting in a land management capacity for a lease, easement, license, or other authorization to act.
(b) The term does not include:
(i) a project or activity undertaken by a private entity that is made possible by the issuance of
permits, licenses, leases, easements, grants, loans, or other authorizations to act by the:
(A) department of environmental quality pursuant to Titles 75, 76, or 82;
(B) department of fish, wildlife, and parks pursuant to Title 87, chapter 4, part 4;
(C) board of oil and gas conservation pursuant to Title 82, chapter 11; or
(D) department of natural resources and conservation or the board of land commissioners pursuant
to Titles 76, 77, 82, and 85; or
(ii) a project or activity involving the issuance of a permit, license, certificate, or other entitlement
for permission to act by another agency acting in a regulatory capacity, either singly or in combination with
- 6 - LC 1423

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC 1423
other state agencies."

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Codification instruction. (1) [Sections 1 and 2] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 75, chapter 1, part 2, and the provisions of Title 75, chapter 1, part 2, apply
to [sections 1 and 2].
(2) [Section 3] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 18, chapter 2, and the
provisions of Title 18, chapter 2, apply to [section 3].
(3) [Section 4] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 22, chapter 3, part 13, and the
provisions of Title 22, chapter 3, part 13, apply to [section 4].

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 7 - LC 1423